Wisconsin, session 2025, AB212.
do enact as follows:AB212,11Section 1. 440.18 of the statutes is created to read:AB212,2,92440.18 Registration of out-of-state telehealth providers. (1) An 3individual who possesses a license, permit, registration, or other approval as a 4health care provider in another state may provide health care services by telehealth 5to patients located in this state if the health care provider registers with the 6department or any credentialing board, as applicable to the health care provider’s 7practice, and provides health care services within the scope of practice established 8under the laws and rules of this state that apply to the health care provider’s 9practice.AB212,2,1210(2) The department or any credentialing board, as applicable, shall register a 11health care provider who does not possess a credential in this state as a telehealth 12provider under this section if the health care provider satisfies all of the following:AB212,2,1413(a) The health care provider submits an application on a form prescribed by 14the department and pays the applicable fee under s. 440.05 (2).AB212,2,2115(b) The health care provider possesses a license, permit, certificate, or other 16approval issued by a governmental authority in another state, the District of 17Columbia, or a possession or territory of the United States that is active and 18unencumbered and that entitles the health care provider to perform health care 19services that are substantially similar to health care services that may be 20performed by a health care provider who possesses a credential issued by the 21department or a credentialing board in this state.AB212,3,422(c) The health care provider has not been subject to any disciplinary action 1relating to his or her license, permit, certificate, or other approval during the 5-year 2period immediately preceding submission of the health care provider’s application 3under par. (a) that has resulted in his or her license, permit, certificate, or other 4approval being limited, suspended, or revoked.AB212,3,65(d) The health care provider designates an agent upon whom service of 6process may be made in this state on a form prescribed by the department.AB212,3,97(e) The health care provider demonstrates to the department or any 8credentialing board, as applicable, that the health care provider is in compliance 9with sub. (5).AB212,3,1210(3) A health care provider registered to provide telehealth services in this 11state under sub. (2) shall be issued a unique telehealth provider identification 12number.AB212,3,1913(4) A health care provider registered to provide telehealth services under this 14section shall notify the department or credentialing board, as applicable, of 15restrictions placed on his or her license, permit, certificate, or other approval in any 16state or jurisdiction and of any disciplinary action taken or pending against him or 17her in any state or jurisdiction. Notification under this subsection shall be provided 18within 5 business days after the restriction is placed or disciplinary action is 19initiated or taken.AB212,4,720(5) If a health care provider registered under this section possesses a license, 21permit, certificate, or other approval issued by a governmental authority in another 22state, the District of Columbia, or a possession or territory of the United States that 23entitles the health care provider to perform health care services that are 1substantially similar to health care services that may be performed by a health care 2provider who possesses a credential issued by the department or a credentialing 3board in this state and who is required under law to maintain and have in effect 4malpractice liability insurance, the health care provider registered under this 5section shall maintain and have in effect malpractice liability insurance coverage 6that covers services provided to patients in this state evidenced by one of the 7following:AB212,4,88(a) Personal liability coverage in the amounts specified under s. 655.23 (4).AB212,4,109(b) Coverage under a group liability policy providing individual coverage for 10the health care provider in the amounts specified under s. 655.23 (4).AB212,4,1511(6) A health care provider registered to provide telehealth services under this 12section may not open an office in this state and may not provide in-person health 13care services to patients located in this state unless the health care provider obtains 14a credential in this state and provides in-person health care services only within 15the scope of that credential.AB212,4,1816(7) The department shall publish on its website a list of all health care 17providers registered to provide telehealth services under this section and include, 18to the extent applicable, all of the following:AB212,4,1919(a) The registrant’s name.AB212,4,2020(b) The registrant’s health care occupation.AB212,4,2221(c) A brief explanation of the registrant’s training and education, including 22completion dates and any certificates or degrees obtained.AB212,5,223(d) The registrant’s out-of-state health care license, permit, certificate, or 1other approval, including any identification number associated with the registrant’s 2license, permit, certificate, or other approval.AB212,5,43(e) The registrant’s telehealth provider identification number issued under 4sub. (3).AB212,5,55(f) The registrant’s specialty.AB212,5,76(g) Whether the registrant is board certified and by which board the 7registrant is board certified.AB212,5,88(h) A 5-year disciplinary history of the registrant.AB212,5,109(i) The registrant’s medical malpractice insurance provider and any policy 10limits under the registrant’s medical malpractice insurance coverage.AB212,5,1211(j) The name and address of the registrant’s agent designated for service of 12process in this state under sub. (2) (d).AB212,5,1513(8) (a) The department or the applicable credentialing board may take 14disciplinary action against a health care provider registered to provide telehealth 15services under this section if any of the following applies to the registrant:AB212,5,18161. The registrant fails to notify the department or the applicable credentialing 17board of any adverse actions taken against his or her license, permit, certificate, or 18other approval as required under sub. (4).AB212,5,21192. The registrant has restrictions placed on his or her license, permit, 20certificate, or other approval or disciplinary action has been commenced against the 21registrant in any state or jurisdiction.AB212,5,22223. The registrant violates any of the requirements under this section.AB212,6,214. The registrant commits any act that constitutes grounds for disciplinary 2action applicable to the registrant’s health care practice in this state.AB212,6,103(b) Disciplinary action taken by the department or the applicable 4credentialing board against a health care provider registered to provide telehealth 5services under this section may include suspension or revocation of the registrant’s 6registration under this section. A suspension of the registration of a health care 7provider registered to provide telehealth services under this section may be 8accompanied by a corrective action plan as determined by the department or the 9applicable credentialing board, the completion of which may lead to the suspended 10registration being reinstated.AB212,6,1211(9) This section does not apply to a health care provider who provides services 12through telehealth as provided in s. 440.094 (3).AB212,6,1713(10) (a) Registration to provide telehealth services in this state under this 14section expires on the renewal date specified in s. 440.08 (2) (a) that is applicable to 15the health care provider’s practice. The department or credentialing board, as 16appropriate, shall inform a health care provider registered under this section of the 17applicable renewal date upon registration.AB212,6,2018(b) The department or credentialing board, as appropriate, shall renew a 19registration under this section for an applicant who satisfies the requirements for 20registration under sub. (2).AB212,221Section 2. Effective date.AB212,7,21(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after 2publication.AB212,7,33